Utah statutes.
20A-2-401.   Fraudulent registration -- Penalty.
(1)  A person may not willfully cause, procure, or allow himself to be
registered to vote, knowing that he is not eligible to register to vote under
Section 20A-2-101.
(2)  A person may not willfully cause, procure, advise, encourage, or assist
any other person to be registered to vote, knowing or believing that the
person is not eligible to register to vote.
(3)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
